Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.606

Teacher and administrator professional learning—Working with paraeducators.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the paraeducator board created in RCW 28A.413.020 and the professional educator standards board, shall design a training program for teachers and administrators as it relates to their role working with paraeducators. Teacher training must include how to direct a paraeducator working with students in the paraeducators' classroom. Administrator training must include how to supervise and evaluate paraeducators.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the training program designed under subsection (1) of this section must be made available to public schools, school districts, and educational service districts.

[ 2017 c 237 s 13.]